Washington statutes.
RCW 44.28.200

Review of the apple health and homes program.

The joint committee must review the efficacy of the apple health and homes program established by chapter 216, Laws of 2022 and report its findings to the appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2027. The review must include a recommendation on whether this program should be continued without change or should be amended or repealed.

[ 2022 c 216 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2022 c 216: See notes following RCW 74.09.885.